Summary
"Allen and Harris are happy to bring to market this two bedroom ground floor apartment set within a modern block on the St Martins Court just on the outskirts of Combe Down, and is decorated to a good standard."
"A substantial Grade I Listed five storey terrace townhouse with a lovely garden and four bedroom mews house with garaging and off street parking. Main house approx. 6,781sqft. Mews House 1,271sqft. Total 8,364sqft."
"A private and elegant family house with spectacular views, set in approximately 10 acres of wonderful gardens, woodland and fields"
"Sion Hill Place is an absolute hidden gem of pure Georgian elegance named as one of the top 6 residential streets in the UK by The Times in 2019. Apartment 5 is a stunning 3 bedrooms, 3 bathroom upper maisonette. The apartment benefits from stunning views to both the front and rear."
An attractive 3-4 bedroom Grade II* Listed Georgian townhouse in the heart of Bath. 
"Spectacular third floor apartment offering flexible living over two floors. Reception entrance, bespoke hand finished kitchen, living room with south facing aspect, 2 bedrooms with en-suite facilites and additional living space to the fourth floor. Added benefit of a lift to access each upper floor."
A handsome family house set in the most extraordinary position with approximately 0.76 acres of gardens enjoying far-reaching views across the City
"A rare opportunity to acquire a magnificent ground and first floor Grade I listed 3 bedroom garden maisonette, retaining a wealth of period features, along with a spacious one bedroom courtyard apartment and a private parking space, in need of some cosmetic updating and located in Bath’s..."
"A beautifully designed contemporary home that has been finished to a very high standard with an accent on space, light and fantastic views"
"Freehold. Attractive former care home. 20 bedrooms over four floors. Substantial detached Edwardian property. c.0.58 acres, beautiful views to the south. Suitable for a variety of care categories"
"A unique opportunity to purchase a brand new, contemporary 4/5 bedroom, eco-build family home of over 3400 sq.ft. set in a level south-facing garden and just one mile from Bath city centre"
"Apartment 4, Sion Hill Place is a stunning Grade I listed, second floor 2 bedroom, 2 bathroom apartment. The apartment benefits from stunning views to both the front and rear. Sion Hill place has been totally refurbished to an exceptional standard."
"The Northside houses on Bridgetower Drive is a 2,718 sq. ft 5 bed house with Georgian proportions including open plan living accommodation in addition to drawing room with exceptional views."
"Two plots remain in this superb modern gated development of four townhouses situated in this highly desirable area of Bath. With beautiful fittings and a careful consideration to design, these homes offer fine views over countryside with all the added benefits of modern living including parking."
"A substantial Victorian terraced house set over five floors. Currently laid out as a courtyard apartment on the lower ground floor, an apartment on the ground floor and a three storey maisonette with an extensive garden to the first, second and third floors."
"Four, spectacular, traditionally styled, terraced houses with a contemporary twist. Intricately designed these properties are awe-inspiring on every level. Following Georgian style architecture and traditional Bath stone frontage these four houses are flawlessly presented."
"A wonderfully light and attractive, detached family home set in an acre of beautifully maintained gardens and having fine countryside views, 4 double bedrooms, double garage, annexe/studio all set in the heart of a quiet village location with an excellent community."
A beautifully proportioned three bedroom Grade II listed house in need of some updating with the benefit of a garage.
"An extremely handsome extended five bedroom detached family home with enviable rural views. Set just to the east of Bath city center, the property boasts immaculately presented accommodation over two floors, along with extensive gardens, garaging and gated parking."
A detached family home with elevated southerly views and gardens of about 0.6 acres.
The upper floors of 30-31 Stall Street provides a unique investment opportunity to acquire four newly refurbished apartments located in Bath City Centre.
"A beautiful Grade II listed townhouse providing over 2,800 sq. ft. of accommodation with fine westerly views and a charming garden"
An exceptionally-positioned Grade II Listed regency townhouse.
"A charming, detached, five bedroom home with countryside views. The House Formerly two cottages, this charming detached, semi-rural property has been further extended to create a substantial family home. Inside, engineered wooden floorboards flow from one end of the house to the other. Doors on..."
"Gorgeous and rarely available 6-bedroom Victorian villa with huge period character and appeal, in Bear Flat, just above the City of Bath. * 3D Virtual Tour available *"
"A lovely modern, three-bedroom family home located on a quiet cul-de-sac off Wellsway"
A brand new spacious lateral apartment within a Grade I listed building with views of the Pump Rooms and Bath’s renowned georgian street scene. Apartment two is located on the second floor of this Grade I listed historic georgian building. The apartment overlooks Stall Street and the Roman Baths...
"A beautifully presented five bedroom semi-detached period house with wonderful Edwardian proportions and 3,500 square feet of extended and refurbished accommodation for modern day family living"
"A hidden gem of Regency elegance, voted one of the top 6 places to reside in the UK by The Times in 2019. High ceilings, ornate fire places, this apartment retains a number of original features and finished to a high quality spec. Versatile living space. Added benefit of a lift in the buil..."
Sion Hill Place is an absolute hidden gem of pure Georgian elegance named as one of the top 6 residential streets in the UK by The Times in 2019. Apartment 3 is a stunning 1 bedroom apartment with beautifully cornicing and ornate ceilings throughout. The apartment benefits from small outside b...
Five storey house in popular Georgian terrace one mile from Bath city centre. 6 Percy Place is a Grade II listed Georgina town house with many of the period features retained. The house is set over 5 floors with well-proportioned accommodation. The entrance lobby leads to the dining room with a...
"Vendors suited. Beautifully presented and extended detached family home, in a quiet location. The property consists of 4 double bedrooms, 4 bath/shower rooms (including 3 en-suites), plus cloakroom, large welcoming entrance hall, open plan underfloor heated kitchen/dining/living area, separa..."
"The Southside Townhouse on Bridgetower Drive at Holburne Park is a 2,167 sq. ft four-bed house with open plan living accommodation, drawing room and study."
This classic three bedroom Georgian Grade II Listed townhouse is a stylish and comfortable home retaining a wealth of period features along with modern twists.
"Tucked away at the end of a sweeping private driveway, Meadow Farm Cottage occupies one of the most secluded plots you could hope to find this close to Bath. This substantial, detached three bedroom family home has been renovated to a high standard and makes the most of its stunning location."
"Set in a prime location within Bath’s beautiful northern slopes, this late1950s built family home sits tucked away down a small private road in Lansdown on the Cotswold Way. Arranged over one level it comprises four bedrooms, two bathrooms, two reception rooms and comes with an u..."
Arranged over three floors the five-bedroom property has been sympathetically renovated from top to bottom to bring it back to its former glory while meeting all modern standards. A labour of love for the current owners it has taken several years to transform and now presents an excellent opportu...
A splendid three bedroom single storey family residence in an excellent location on a quiet leafy road in Combe Down. This charming home benefits from driveway and garage parking and private walled mature gardens.
"This gorgeous, detached home features 4 bedrooms, large driveway, southerly gardens and garage in a supremely desirable location, in the heart of Beechen Cliff. CHAIN FREE - 3D Virtual Tour available"
A beautifully presented and recently constructed two bedroom first floor apartment with lift access and parking set in six acres of parkland.
Rarely available and wonderful semi-detached family home in the heart of Bloomfield Avenue. 4 bedrooms driveway parking and southerly gardens to Bloomfield Allotments.
"Dating from the 1950s and extended in the early 21st Century, one couldn't wish for a better location for access to the extensive array of schools along with The University of Bath. The kitchen has been attractively updated and with two sizeable reception rooms offering the perfect family home."
This superb detached family home is situated in an elevated position on the south-eastern side of Bath. The home offers a substantial rear garden and well-planned accommodation making it a superb family home with convenient access to Bath’s amenities and excellent schools.
"Stunning four bedroom period property dating back to 1729 located in the desirable neighbourhood of Northend on the eastern outskirts of the city of Bath. Completely renovated over three floors delivering 205 sq m/2207 sq ft of internal space, Emmeline Place is a Grade II* listed hist..."
A rare opportunity to acquire one of only four detached properties in The Tyning with wonderful views of the City.
"A wonderful Grade II listed Georgian village house offering more than 2,600 sq. ft. of accommodation situated in the heart of this popular village"
"City centre Georgian home with views, currently run as a successful air BnB, averaging £1250 per night. Shop available by separate negotiation. The House
Classic Georgian features abound in this Grade II listed flying freehold home - tall ceilings, transom windows, an elegant staircase, shuttere..."
"This is a well-presented five bedroom family home benefitting from a handsome Bath stone façade, retained features plus spacious and versatile accommodation. It is located in the highly sought after area of Newbridge, just 1.7 level miles to Queen Square and all that Bath city centre has t..."
"*3D Interactive Tour available* This wonderful, Grade II listed, detached Victorian villa is located in the heart of sought-after Widcombe and full of features. It offers 4 double bedrooms, gardens, garage and parking space as well fabulous views across Bath."
"A fine period home in the heart of a highly desirable picturesque country village, close to Bath."
"A spacious split-level four bedroom detached family home. Offering 1,860 Sq.Ft. of accommodation on a 0.2 acre plot and immaculately presented throughout. Highly desired location close to the local high street, Royal United Hospital and with easy, walkable, access to the city. "
"A charming, light and spacious three bedroom end of terrace house with lovely gardens in this excellent location."
An attractive period detached house on the edge of highly popular Northend.
"An elegant lateral first-floor apartment spread over two Grade I listed Georgian townhouses, in the centre of Bath. Every aspect of this beautiful property is impressive: from its classical Georgian facade, through to its spacious and elegant proportions. This is a beautifully presented three be..."
"Unique opportunity to purchase 2No flats with planning permission granted for erection of additional 1No 3 bed dwelling. 2 bedroom, lower ground floor garden flat with planning permission to extend and alter internally, and erection of 1No. 3 bedroom dwelling. 2 bedroom ground floor flat. "
"Beautifully presented five bedroom, semi-detached home in the ever popular Lower Oldfield Park"
"A five-bedroom Georgian townhouse in a central Bath location Number 26 New King Street is a Grade II listed Georgian townhouse in a street of similar terraced properties, including one which is now the Herschel Museum of Astronomy. It's an attractive building, with a classic, columned portico fr..."
"Occupying three floors of a handsome townhouse in Lansdown, a conservation area just north of Bath's historic city centre, is this lovely two-bedroom maisonette. The home is positioned on a Grade I-listed Regency terrace on the coveted Sion Hill Place, named by The Times as one of the six best st..."
"A four-bedroom luxury contemporary townhouse on the sought-after northern slopes of Bath. Lansdown Square West is a luxury four-bedroom contemporary townhouse within a quiet square on the edge of a prestigious development in the highly regarded residential area of Lansdown. At the front, the pro..."
"Approximately sixty years old, this lovely family home could not be better located for access to schooling and numerous country facilities. Offering potential to extend or develop, the options are endless subject to planning. Ample parking and a garage add further appeal in this small cul-de-sac."
" A bright and spacious Victorian semi detached house retaining a number of delightful features such as beautiful tiled entrance hall, high ceilings, bay windows and feature fireplaces positioned in this convenient and sought after location. This well presented house has been thoughtfully extende..."
"Offering a high quality of interior design and specification, this luxurious townhouse is now offered by the first owner after seven years of occupation. Numerous benefits include a flexible layout with two en-suite bedrooms and excellent reception space over the ground and first floors."
A two bedroom garden maisonette in Bath’s prestigious Great Pulteney Street. Number 38 Great Pulteney Street is at the Holburne Museum end of this elegant terrace of fine Georgian townhouses. Flat 1 is Grade I listed and is arranged over two floors - the ground and lower ground. Its entrance is ...
Entrance Hall l 3 bedrooms l 2 bathrooms l cloakroom l Kitchen/dining room l tv room l Elegant Drawing room l Balcony L Contents included (Sold as seen)
Detached family home in the heart of Lansdown with far-reaching views
"A superb four bedroom family house positioned favourably in this highly sought-after area and providing 1,766 sq. ft. of accommodation."
"A superb example of one of these popular 5-bedroom townhouses, well-situated within this highly sought-after development on the prime northern slopes of Bath"
"A Grade II listed, four-bedroom, Georgian townhouse in Bath city centre Built in 1820, Number three is the third house along a row of nine elegant Grade II Georgian townhouses on a private road. This property retains many period details as well as features a modern extension. An arch frames the ..."
"A charming two-storey semi-detached Grade II listed Villa, well situated for all that Widcombe has to offer"
"A Unique Three Double Bedroom Single Storey Contemporary Home Built In 2016. Set In A Tranquil, Landscaped Situation In The Sought After Residential Location Off North Road, Combe Down. "
"An elegant double fronted Grade II Listed Georgian townhouse offering over 1,900 square feet of versatile accommodation arranged over four floors ideally positioned in this centrally located in the heart of the city centre. This versatile and beautifully presented property retains a number of del..."
"A Spacious Detached Three/Four Bedroom Bungalow Well Presented & Set In An Exclusive Sought After Area, Convenient For Bath University, Wessex Water, Bath Clinic & Within Easy Reach Of The City Centre. "
"A most attractive Grade II Listed townhouse, close to Bath’s iconic Royal Crescent and Assembly Rooms. Featuring beautifully proportioned rooms and finished to a high standard neatly arranged over five floors."
A terraced 4 bed 2 storey home at the popular Holburne Park development. Open plan living area with contemporary kitchen opening to private rear garden. Allocated parking for 2 cars.
"This is a beautifully spacious ground floor apartment boasting the principal rooms and creating the most sumptuous living, situated within this popular area of Bath. The accommodation is approximately 1,446 sq.ft. including two bedrooms and a beautiful drawing room."
A splendid 3 bedroom detached house set in approximately half an acre of gardens with far reaching views over The City of Bath.
"A spacious and well-presented 4 bedroomed home, situated in the popular development of Clarks Way,"
"A Georgian five bedroom detached home in the AONB village of Midford on the outskirts of Bath. Spacious accommodation of 2,342 Sq.Ft over three floors and the potential for a separate annex. Set in stunning countryside with the city just three miles from the property."
A magnificent ground floor two bedroom apartment with a private courtyard in this desired crescent.
"Sitting in the heart of the World Unesco Heritage city of Bath, seconds from its majestic abbey and Roman Baths, is this exceptional Grade II-listed three-bedroom apartment. Extending over 1,600 sq ft, it has been meticulously restored by the current owner, who has celebrated the building's origi..."
"Unmodernised, semi-detached Victorian house in Larkhall."
"A light and contemporary three-bedroom garden maisonette situated within a majestic Grade I listed Georgian townhouse, offering substantial living accommodation. The Garden Maisonette, 6 Sion Hill Place is situated within a majestic Grade I listed Georgian townhouse and is a ground and lower gro..."
"A new development of 3 (1 now remaining) contemporary 4-bedroom, 4-bathroom eco-build family houses of circa 2000 sqft (185 sqm), each with off-street parking for 3 cars and EV charging points."
Exceptional 4 bedroom mid terrace home with delightful views from the rear over Holburne Park and towards the Charlcombe valley beyond. Beautifully arranged open plan living.
A 4 bedroom 2 storey home with flexible accommodation at the popular Holburne Park development. Open plan living area with contemporary kitchen opening to private rear garden.
"Situated within this superb location to the south of the City, Avalon is a superb detached family home comprising three/four bedrooms, two bathrooms and two reception rooms along with a double garage and level gardens."
A 3 bedroom stylish home offers a contemporary interior design behind its period Bath stone façade. It benefits from a roof terrace with far reaching views and is in the popular location near Lansdown Crescent.
This modern detached bungalow offers well proportioned accommodation which has recently been redecorated throughout and is offered to the market without the complication of an onward sales chain. The accommodation is approached through an entrance porch to a spacious 'L' shaped entrance hall from...
"An early 1990's detached house in one of the most sought after roads on the Western fringes of Bath and within a Cul-de-sac location. The accommodation is arranged over two floors to comprise Central Hallway, Cloakroom, Study, Living Room, Conservatory, Dining Room, modern fitted Kitchen with..."
"Coming soon with viewings on 1st April 2023 by appointment. On Rockliffe Road is this outstanding four bedroom home in Bathwick. With four bedrooms, excellent garden and large open living space this home will be popular."
"Portfolio8 are delighted to bring to the market this 4 bedroom extended, beautifully designed and maintained end terrace property on Crescent Gardens, The property is currently being used as a Holiday Let and generates £5,664.65pcm. Two off-road parking spaces included. "
*Spacious family home* *Attractive detached property in Claverton* *Just 3 miles from Bath* *Possible potential for plot subject to planning permission* *Two sitting rooms* *Dining room* *Four double bedrooms* *Driveway parking* *Mature Garden*
" Offered to the market with no onward chain, can be found this 7 bedroom terraced property, currently achieving £4555pcm as a House in Multiple Occupation investment. Presented excellently throughout, the property benefits from modern decor following a recent refurbishment, as well as sev..."
A pretty Grade II listed townhouse with picturesque city views situated on the popular lower north slopes of Bath.
A charming single story detached property benefiting from a wealth of potential in this highly desirable location.
"This Grade I Listed apartment is set within a magnificent Georgian terrace on the eastern side of the city. Occupying the ground and first floor with high ceilings and deep sash windows, taking full advantage of the southerly views. Many period features have been retained within this imposing home."
"Occupying the northern end of the fifth floor with riverside views, this much improved apartment has lift access to all floors and the covered parking bay. Convenient for riverside walks and level access to the city, the modern specification will appeal to the most cost conscious of buyers."
"An elegant semi-detached Grade II listed 3-bedroom Georgian villa of handsome proportions retaining a wealth of period detail, located in a fine elevated position, enjoying wonderful far reaching panoramic viewings of Bath and conveniently within 15 minutes-walk of the city centre."
"A rare opportunity to purchase a stunning Grade I listed 2 bed maisonette on the popular Great Pulteney Street in the centre of the beautiful city of Bath. This property is not just about location, the grand and spectacular Georgian detail in and around the property is what brings it t..."
Property of this lovely contemporary style and central location seldom come to the open market. Already a stunning home but with further planning for loft conversion if required. Act quickly to arrange your appointment to view.
"A spacious three bedroom garden apartment in a large Victorian building in the sought after Weston Park West close to the Cotswold Way, Bath city centre and Weston village."
 A versatile two/three bedroom chalet bungalow positioned in this sought after location enjoying far reaching views and offering great potential to modernise/extend subject to the relevant consents. ACCOMMODATION porch and entrance hall kitchen breakfast room 15ft sitting room/bedroom din...
"Ideally located in the heart of the city of Bath, this opulent collection of one and two bedroom age-exclusive apartments could be the perfect place to call home. Our Bath Leat community offers spacious homes with sociable living just a stone's throw away from the River Avon. "
An extremely rare opportunity has arisen to purchase this utterly superb Neo Georgian detached four bedroom property which blends modern construction with period style situated in a highly sought after location in Devonshire Buildings. 
Beautiful ground floor apartment within Grade I listed building situated in the iconic Lansdown crescent.
"A fantastic, detached bungalow situated in a private, sunny and desirable location in Claverton Down. This delightful property benefits from a gated driveway and south facing garden. Located on a private road towards the end of a cul-de-sac. Proximity to the shops and amenities of Combe Down village"
"Stunning family home situated in the heart of Poet's Corner and with a beautiful level of finish, 4 bedrooms and level, southerly facing rear gardens. Early viewing essential"
"Nestled on the Northern slopes of Bath is this beautifully presented, Grade II listed townhouse offering spacious and adaptable living accommodation across three floors with stunning, elevated southerly views. The property is a real credit to the current owners,  having&nbs..."
 A bright and versatile detached house set within delightful gardens of over a third of an acre with wonderful woodland backdrop. This property is ready to be modernised/extend to personal taste subject to the relevant consents and benefits from wonderful far-reaching views. EXTERNALLY The g...
"A rarely available three bedroom Georgian cottage and one of the founding properties of the village. Retaining an abundance of original period features inside and out it could now benefit from a cosmetic refurbishment. Extended to the rear, coach house and potting shed and sold with no onward cha..."
"Beautifully presented modern link-detached, extended 5 bedroom family home in Mulberry Park, Combe Down, Bath. Built in 2017, and extended and improved by the current owners, this family home is in a prime location. Very high specification and plenty of extras including solar panels, und..."
"This superb property is located in the heart of Combe Down offering miles of beautiful countryside on your door step whilst being a short drive to Central Bath, The detached bungalow with integral garage, extensive gardens, driveway and outbuilding offers notable opportunity for the new owner."
A beautifully presented three bedroom detached bungalow sitting in a wonderful plot
"In one of the most popular historical areas of Bath, this well-appointed ground floor apartment is set on the end of a Grade I Listed terrace, overlooking the Holburne Museum and gardens. With a private walled garden, the property is on a level walk of the centre and retains many period features."
A rare opportunity to acquire an attractive and stylish family home in a highly favoured 'No-Through' area within Combe Down. Previously purchased in 2017 from New the current owners have renovated and extended to a first-class specification.
A three bedroom link-detached 1960s house occupying a good sized plot located in ever popular Cranwells Park
A wonderful family home with huge potential situated in an idyllic country setting with views towards Georgian Bath.
Magnificently proportioned bay-fronted semi-detached house opposite Sydney Gardens in this prime central Bath location.
"A handsome 3 bedroom end of terrace town house, one of 4 lovely homes built in 2017 by well the respected local developers, Ashford Homes, finished to a particularly high standard throughout and benefiting from a generous town garden."
"A Victorian terraced home close to the centre of Bath. In need of some modernisation, but in great condition and full of period features. Driveway parking to the rear as well as no onward chain."
"An excellent six bedroom extended family home, currently laid out as a four bedroom dwelling, with the added bonus of a two bedroom annex, which the current owner uses as a successful 'Airbnb'. With a ready made income alongside well balanced accommodation over two floors, this would make a wonde..."
"A pretty, double fronted and detached family home in an elevated position with far reaching views and eco-credentials as well as a heated swimming pool. Situated on the slopes of Bannerdown close to Batheaston Village, a short distance from the historic city of Bath."
"A distinctive, beautifully situated modern detached bungalow built in 2011 in this well regarded road in Bathampton village, benefitting from large gardens, magnificent views toward Solsbury Hill and ample parking and garaging."
Professionally refurbished to exacting standards this GII* Listed upper floor apartment is arranged over three floors providing wonderful open views at the rear. The well-proportioned layout makes comfortable living or an ideal Airbnb opportunity for any investor. No onward chain adds to the appeal
A magnificent property on the slopes between Camden and Larkhall. Offering three double bedrooms with extended accommodation to the ground floor. In the garden there is a garden office and a gate leading to private parking. Presented in excellent condition.
A beautifully presented Grade II listed three bedroom terraced home in this highly desirable Widcombe location.
*MOVE IN FOR SPRING* Plot 555 - The Charlcombe is a fantastic DETACHED family home which boasts ENERGY EFFICIENT SOLAR PANELS and a HIGH SPECIFICATION. The master bedroom includes FITTED WARDROBES and an en-suite. Externally there is a turfed SOUTH FACING garden.
"A stylish 4 bedroom mews house, located in a prime residential area to the rear of the Royal Crescent with the benefit of a single garage, a small courtyard and first floor balcony."
"A handsome, DETACHED BARN CONVERSION located in the pretty village of ENGLISHCOMBE to the south of Bath. With over 1800 sq. feet of living space, bedroom terrace, gated off-street parking, far reaching rural views and large gardens. Potential to extend subject to PP, 3 minute drive to nearest shop. "
A fine Victorian terraced home situated in the highly desirable setting of Widcombe.
A well-appointed apartment with stunning far reaching views from a usable balcony. Having been thoughtfully refurbished to a high standard including a new kitchen. The property is offered with no onward chain and is located in the sought after area of Lansdown with ease of access to the City.
"Situated In a very quiet, sought-after area of Bath, this property offers excellent potential for anyone wanting to place their stamp on a contemporary 1970s style building and make it their own. The property sits in a good sized corner plot that provides plenty of room for expansion."
"Prime location in the World Heritage City of Bath. Close to the Royal United Hospital and Oldfield Secondary. Well presented offering a SOUTH FACING Garden, Three Reception Areas including a 23ft Living area with a 14ft open plan Kitchen and parking for three cars. 360 video available."
"Just over a mile from the centre of Bath - An outstanding building plot with permission for a stunning, contemporary house (271 sqm) with parkland grounds fronting onto the Kennet and Avon canal. In all about 5.2 acres."
"An updated Victorian terraced house with a wonderful terraced garden and stunning city views. Arranged over three floors with adaptable principal bedroom to the top floor, this ever popular location provides ease of access to local amenities, Bath Spa station and the vibrant city centre beyond."
"A comprehensively refurbished, immaculately presented and super stylish 3 bedroom Grade II listed, 3 storey Georgian town house, located adjacent to Royal Victoria Park and conveniently within 15 minutes level walk of Bath city centre."
NO ONWARD CHAIN. An attractive bay-fronted Victorian property occupying an elevated end of terrace position. Garage with hard standing parking space 4 bedrooms and 2 generous reception rooms. Proximity to Chelsea Road shops and cafes. Close to Newbridge Primary School. Good access to travel links 
Beautiful and impressive modern townhouse forming part of this most desirable residential development. Situated within moments' walk of Chelsea Road shops and cafes. Garage and allocated parking bay. Kitchen/dining room opening to west facing rear garden. Family bathroom and en suite.
"A recently refurbished Grade II listed three bedroom terrace cottage. Built c.1830 it retains period features throughout with a south facing garden, home office and double garage. Ideally located for all local amenities, schooling and access to the city and sold with no onward chain."
Rosslyn Road is a pretty tree lined street just to the west of the city centre and this stunning 1930's home home has been sympathetically extended creating a beautiful and stylish family home with enclosed west facing gardens and off road parking.
"A Grade II listed Georgian townhouse perfectly located close to Henrietta Park in the centre of Bath. Currently run as an Air BnB generating £65,000 - £69,000 PA. A Grade II listed Georgian townhouse, perfectly situated in the centre of Bath with accommodation arranged over four floors and with ..."
"A Grade II listed Georgian townhouse conveniently located in the centre of Bath close to the The Theatre Royal .Currently run as an Air BnB generating £60,000 - £65,000 PA. A Grade II listed late Georgian townhouse, perfectly situated in the centre of Bath arranged over four floors. The property..."
"A spacious four bedroom semi-detached family home. Recently extended and refurbished throughout providing modern open-plan living. Close to all Bear Flat amenities, schooling and sold with no onward chain."
"Built approximately 5 years ago this stunning Penthouse, duplex apartment is now offered with no onward chain. Two substantial double bedroom suites take full advantage of the westerly aspect with floor to ceiling glazing. The open plan living area has a fully equipped kitchen and a roof terrace."
A unique four bedroom detached bungalow located on a 0.22 acre plot on a highly desired road in Combe Down village. Planning permission granted for demolition and the building of a new detached four bedroom two storey house with driveway parking. Ideal and rare investment opportunity for the righ...
Charming four bedroom terraced home set over four floors and boasting a generous rear garden
"Eden Terrace is set in the heart of wonderful Larkhall on the edge of Bath. This wonderful family home offers three substantial floors with four bedrooms, sitting room, large kitchen, bathroom and shower room. Delightful views. Nice gardens. Be quick...!"
A beautifully presented apartment in this highly desirable location.
"Presented to the market in turn-key condition, Westmoreland Villas is a beautiful Victorian family home only 10 minutes walk from the heart of Bath. This recently extended and fully refurbished four-bedroom semi-detached home has been modernised to an exquisite standard and tastefully dec..."
"A spacious, light and airy modern townhouse located in a quiet central city backwater with the benefit of 3 bedrooms and a double garage."
"A wonderful apartment within the Iconic Grade I Listed Royal Crescent. It has one of the finest views in the city, the benefit of the Private residences’ garden to the front and garage to the rear of the building."
"An extended five bedroom semi-detached family home. Immaculately presented and kept over the years but now offering the chance for a cosmetic refurbishment throughout. Large well stocked and tended rear garden, close to all local schooling and sold with no onward chain."
"A Spacious Modern Property On This Prestigious Road In The Highly Desired Combe Down Village. Versatile Accommodation With Three Bedrooms & Two Receptions, With Off-Street Parking. Ideally Located For All Local Amenities, Plus Bus Service To The City Centre."
Period house l 3 bedrooms l period features l communal gardens l allocated parking and garage.
"Located In A Quite Cul-De-Sac Just In The Popular Bloomfield Area, A Detached Modern Four Bedroom Family Home With Enclosed Lawned Rear Garden, Integral Garage And Carport With Driveway Parking."
"A three bedroom detached bungalow situated in a private lane on a 0.2 acre plot. Immaculately presented throughout, dated but offering plenty of potential to modernise and extend if required. Large garage and workshop and sold with no onward chain."
"A superb opportunity to purchase this second floor apartment within the world famous Royal Crescent. There is a stunning view of the sweeping crescent and private lawns to the front, it also has the rare benefit of a garage to the rear of the property."
High quality and high-tech three bedroom semi-detached house built in a time (1920's) when homes came with big gardens. 
"Built in 2017, this three storey semi-detached townhouse is set in the very popular Mulberry Park development. It boasts four double bedrooms, three bathrooms, garage and off-street parking. Viewing is highly recommended."
"A recently renovated 3rd Floor, 3 bedroom apartment with river views and an allocated underground parking space"
A Victorian three bedroom semi detached house with garden and parking for two cars within 0.3 miles from Queens Square being sold with no onward chain.
"A charming family home within the highly desirable Mulberry Park development. This stunning home offers a kitchen/dining room, a separate living room and four double bedrooms arranged over three floors. There is parking for two cars and an enclosed garden."
BRAND NEW HOUSE l HAND-CRAFTED BESPOKE KITCHEN l AVAILABLE SPRING 2023 l HIGH SPEC DESIGNER BATHROOM l ELECTRIC CAR CHARGING POINT l 3 BEDROOMS AND STUDY/BEDROOM 4 l ALLOCATED PARKING l UNIQUE STYLE PROPERTY l BUILDZONE WARRANTY l ENGINEERED OAK FLOORING
"This three bedroom semi detached family home is in a great location for easy access to the city, university and all local schools. Well presented throughout it offers the potential to extend if required. Established front and rear gardens with a detached garden studio for those working from home."
"A conveniently located and well-presented investment property currently let out for the 23/24 period producing an annual income of £38,940 creating a yield approaching 6%."
A 1930's semi detached family home set in a widening corner plot with off street parking and a garage.
"An exquisite first floor apartment situated within Catharine Place next to The Royal Crescent and The Circus. Impressive drawing room, kitchen/breakfast room, principle bedroom, further double bedroom, recently refurbished luxury shower room. Currently used as a successful airbnb."
"A stunning two double bedroom apartment on the third floor, accessed by a lift, of this imposing detached building which sits in beautifully appointed communal grounds and is approached by a gated private driveway. The reception room has westerly views over the park, whilst the bedrooms both have..."
A superbly finished and spacious 3 bedroom maisonette apartment within a short walk of Widcombe High Street and the station.
"A contemporary four bedroom home forming part of the Octohaus development. An exclusive collection of eight, three and four bedroom design led houses with parking in Bath."
An extended five bedroom semi-detached family home. With four reception rooms it offers the potential for a separate annex or supplementary rental income. Quiet village location with good size south facing garden and no onward chain.
A fine example of a beautifully renovated apartment within a magnificent Grade II listed Georgian townhouse on one of Bath's most prestigious streets. This Grade II Listed garden apartment is situated within a level walk of the city centre. Benefiting from a private courtyard entrance at the fro...
 A larger than average end of terrace 1930’s house most conveniently situated in this highly sought after road on the sought after western outskirts of the city. The property enjoys a pleasing open outlook and benefits from a single garage and additional driveway parking. EXTERNALLY Th...
A beautifully presented extended three double bedroom family home now offering a huge kitchen/dining room with a wood burner and double doors looking onto the west facing garden along with a separate living room.
"A large lateral apartment with level access, pretty garden, off road parking and balcony enjoying picturesque and panoramic views over the city with a southerly aspect."
A beautifully presented Grade II listed 3 bedroom cottage with a secure level garden in the popular area of Lansdown. 
"An excellent investment opportunity to purchase this substantial stone-built double bay fronted Edwardian property set in a cul de sac location currently configured as a 6-bedroom HMO. The property is let for the next academic year at £46,800 PA. (giving a gross 7.2% return)"
"An excellent opportunity to purchase this substantial semi-detached HMO investment property with 6 double bedrooms all with ensuites and situated in an extremely sought-after location. The property is let for the next academic year for £46,800 PA (giving a healthy 7.2% gross return)."
New to the market this beautiful 4 bedroomed house with GARAGE AND PARKING located in a highly sought after area of the beautiful City of Bath! Lansdown heights was built in 1998 and lies within a conservation area and has become one of the most sought after areas due to the close pro...
"An extended family home in Combe Down offering over 1,320 square feet of accommodation with a south west facing garden. No onward chain."
A superb three bedroom semi-detached family home with possibility to extend subject to planning situated in this highly residential area. Benefitting from a pretty south facing garden and off-street parking along with a garage.
An exquisite 2 bedroom first floor apartment with a beautiful balcony and wonderful open aspects of the park opposite
*Reserve now to receive a complimentary interior design service and NEPTUNE furniture contribution. Weston Mews is an exclusive development of eight new build houses in the popular suburb of Weston. A superb new development of contemporary houses in the desirable suburb of Weston less than 1.5 m...
"Three bedroom semi-detached home situated in a highly desired residential square. Immaculately refurbished and presented throughout whilst offering further potential to extend. Ideal location for access to local amenities, schooling and countryside walks."
"A desirable character house with independent attached studio or one bedroom annexe, standing on an impressive corner plot of around 0.15 acre on high ground and enjoying outstanding views."
Weston Mews is an exclusive development of eight new build houses in the popular suburb of Weston. A superb new development of contemporary houses in the desirable suburb of Weston less than 1.5 miles from Bath city centre and Bath Spa railway station. All houses include a minimum of 2 off-stree...
"A Well Presented & Spacious Detached Family Home With Four Bedrooms (Two En-Suite) Offering Versatile Accommodation Over Three Floors. Additional Benefits Include A Good Sized Private Landscaped Gardens to the rear, Garage & Off Street Parking. "
"An excellent semi-detached home with a charming south-facing garden which is well-stocked with deciduous plants and shrubs. Beautifully finished and ready to move into, with plenty of scope to extend in the future."
"A stunning four double bedroom family home with over 1500sq ft accommodation, in a popular residential area of Bath with great local transport and amenities."
A spacious four bedroom end-terrace period cottage. Immaculately presented throughout it makes an ideal family home in a peaceful village location. Nice size garden with large garage and close to all local schooling and amenities.
Link-detached l Pricipal bedroom with en suite shower room l 3 further double bedrooms l 2 reception rooms l garden l off street parking l garage.
"Rear extended to 1663sqft, enjoying large level gardens, garage & driveway and a detached 498sqft outbuilding- this extremely spacious detached bungalow is more than big enough to suit families as well as downsizers. Sole Agents. EPC rating D. Council tax band- D."
We are delighted to bring this stunning and beautifully appointed apartment to the market. The property is located on the first floor and boasts large windows in every room allowing tremendous amounts of light to flood the apartment.
"A superb Listed ground and first floor maisonette with its own private entrance, garden and gated courtyard which provides secure parking for 2 vehicles. Contained within a charming Listed period house, the apartment has been refurbished and sympathetically modernised (complete with a stunning c..."
"*NEW RELEASE* Plot 642, The Milsom is a HIGH QUALITY four-bedroom home, featuring a LARGE open plan kitchen/diner, a separate utility area and a spacious living room. Upstairs the master bedroom boasts an EN-SUITE and FITTED WARDROBES. Show home available to view. "
"Now offered with vacant possession, this lovely terraced house is now presented in very good order and with no onward chain. Making an ideal and versatile family home, the popular location offers ease of access to all amenities including schools, shops, transportation links and city centre."
"A stunning second floor apartment situated in 'Royal View' within the desirable Crest Nicholson Riverside Development. The property is presented to the highest standard throughout, with light, flexible living accommodation, two double en-suite bedrooms, balcony with river views and allocated unde..."
"*MORTGAGE PEACE OF MIND* Make your move to Plot 572, a UNIQUE high quality new build and we will pay £1,000 pcm towards your mortgage payments for 6 months! This new home features an OPEN PLAN kitchen/diner and a SPACIOUS living room with french doors leading to a turfed rear garden."
"FREEHOLD COUNCIL TAX BAND B VACANT PROPERTY We are delighted to offer to the market this extensive, three-bedroom detached home on Bloomfield Road, Bath. The accommodation is spread across three floors and has been nicely configured to accommodate a ra..."
The property comprises a substantial semi detached building originally dating from the 1930's set in a commanding position on Englishcombe Lane with views across the City and surrounding countryside to the front. The property has been recently refurbished to include a loft conversion and now prov...
A three bedroom semi-detached family home. Partially extended to the rear providing spacious accommodation with potential to extend further. Large well tended rear garden with home office and driveway parking with garage.
*Spacious 6 Bed House in a quiet location just off Newbridge Road* *Perfect Family Home or Investment* *6 good sized bedrooms* *3 bathrooms (1 en-suite)* *Large Open Plan Living/Diner* *Modern Kitchen* *Gardens and Driveway Parking* 
"A detached 1970`s property situated on a generous plot in this peaceful and scenic cul-de-sac in the heart of Northend with garage and driveway parking. Adaptable accommodation over two floors with garage, and workshop below. Countryside village life within 3½ miles from Bath city centre. No chain."
"Please quote reference RM0334.  This charming detached period cottage has stunning countryside views, parking and lovely cottage gardens.  The accommodation is spread over three storeys and is flexible, it can be set up as a family home on the ground and..."
"An impressive detached four double bedroom property, set within a short distance of the city centre. The property is currently being used as a HMO but would also make a great family home, subject to the necessary consents."
Three bedroom end of terrace family home on the ever popular First Avenue
A beautifully proportioned two bedroom apartment situated on the garden level of this fine Grade I Listed townhouse forming one of Bath's finest terraces.
"£1,000 PCM TOWARDS YOUR MORTGAGE PAYMENTS FOR 6 MONTHS*: Make your move to plot 634 this Spring, a highly desirable four-bedroom FAMILY home. Boasting a LARGE open plan kitchen/diner with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and FITTED WARDROBES. "
"An excellent three-bedroom terrace period house with panoramic views in a quiet road situated just off Lyncombe Hill in popular Widcombe, Bath. There is no onward chain."
"Camden is a fashionable and popular address and this stunning sweeping crescent is home to this superb courtyard apartment. In close proximity are numerous city centre attractions, which are accessible by walking down Lansdown Road."
Offered for sale with no onward chain. This fine 1930s family home is located in a sought after location and on a generous corner plot with mature gardens front and rear. There is scope to extend to the side and rear of the property (STPP). Close to local shops and other amenities 
"A superb 3 bedroom apartment enjoying balcony views and designated parking, situated within this sought-after landmark development"
"Great Pulteney Street is one of the best streets in the city boasting wide Georgian pavements leading into the heart World Heritage Bath, access to the Rec to hear the roar of Bath Rugby, and a range of boutique hotels and parks to enjoy a cocktail or picnic."
"Situated just off of Bear Flat, just below Beechen Cliff woodlands, this three bedroomed mid-terraced Victorian house offers light and airy living and panoramic views across the city centre of Bath."
A detached and extended family home located in the popular Odd Down area of Bath. This excellent property benefits from ample off-street parking and large southwest facing rear garden. Close to local shops. Close to local schools. Dual aspect living/dining room. Ground floor shower room & WC
"An immaculately presented semi-detached house situated within the highly regarded Ensleigh Development in the popular area of Lansdown. The property boasts modern accommodation set over two floors as well as enclosed gardens, driveway parking and garaging."
"A central Grade II listed two-bedroom maisonette set across two floors, boasting a walled private rear garden."
A Top Floor Two Bedroom Apartment Located Close To Local Amenities And Within Walking Distance Of The City Centre. The Accommodation Is Well Presented & Benefits From Double Glazing And Gas Heating. 
A charming two double bedroom town house arranged over two storeys with the benefit of two ensuites and a private courtyard to the rear. The property is situated in a central location within the city centre of Bath just a few minutes from all amenities.
A charming country cottage situated in a desirable village on Bath's southern fringes with useful annexe/garage building.
"A wonderful 2/3 bedroom apartment with excellent views of Bath, ample accommodation with lift access located just off of Great Pulteney Street. Offered with a single garage and no onward chain."
"One of only two modern apartments sharing the fourth floor, with bilateral views, a social living space and two balconies, centrally located with uninterrupted views overlooking the park and river"
"A superb two-bedroom apartment in this Grade II listed building located in the centre of Bath overlooking Pulteney Weir and the historic Pulteney Bridge, offered for sale with a secured, covered parking space. The Empire was originally built as a luxury hotel in 1901 for hotelier Alfr..."
"Moments walk from the city center and behind the Royal Crescent a late Victorian terraced home with three bedroom accommodation (Bathroom and separate shower room), a communicating living room/dining room, a well appointed kitchen with a utility are beyond and a small courtyard garden."
Opportunity to purchase an ongoing freehold investment of a terrace property divided into two apartments with a nice garden in this sought after location. (Please be aware the ground floor flat is a protected tenancy).c
"A distinctive and highly appealing three bedroom late Victorian/early Edwardian house with sunny rear garden and excellent views, situated within easy reach of wide ranging amenities in both Larkhall Village and Camden"
"An immaculate city centre two bedroom apartment occupies the principle rooms of a Grade II Georgian Townhouse, with fabulous room proportions, two double bedrooms, two bathrooms and a fully fitted kitchen all presented and equipped to a high standard."
"This attractive Grade I Listed third floor apartment within The Circus, offers two bedrooms and superb views to the rear. This is a wonderful opportunity to live in this highly desirable address."
"An exquisite garden maisonette, just off Walcot Street within a no through road. Living room, two double bedrooms, snug/bedroom three, family bathroom, kitchen/diner. Garden over looking the river. No onward chain."
"Ref: JM0133 A superb opportunity to acquire a unique garden apartment in the Weston area of the Georgian city of Bath. Tucked away off a residential area, this apartment is coming to the market for the first time in over 20 years and is offered with no onward chain. Packed full of beautiful ch..."
"A charming three bedroom cottage in a secluded terrace at the heart of Larkhall. The House
Larkhall Terrace is a row of cottages, tucked away in quiet location in the heart of Larkhall village. Built in the early 1900s, it retains its historical charm. Number 3 is the penultimate building in th..."
"Charming and beautifully presented, three bedroom terraced home"
"Please quote reference RM0334.  This charming Grade-II listed two-bedroom house is located on Church Road, a quiet and private lane in Bath’s sought-after Weston neighbourhood.  Accommodation includes sitting room, dining room/snug, kitchen/breakfast room, cloakroom, two bathro..."
"A spacious 4 bedroom family home situated in a highly convenient, elevated location with panoramic city views. Garden to the rear. Garage and off road parking for one vehicle. No onward chain."
"A beautifully presented three bedroom semi detached house, redesigned and refitted to a highly impressive standard, situated in a favoured location close to shops, schools and other amenities at Larkhall."
"A generous, and extended, 4 bedroomed semi-detached family home set in a quiet cul-de-sac location close to local amenities and public transport links."
"A beautiful second floor 2 bedroom apartment located in a highly desirable residential position, adjacent to the Royal Crescent and enjoying magnificent westerly views to the rear over Royal Victoria Park."
"65% SOLD. All apartments are ready to be occupied. Arlington House is an exclusive collection of 38 apartments, set within a Georgian style building, situated in the centre of Bath. Consisting of Studio, 1 & 2 bedroom properties, some of which benefit from unique views of Bath Abbey and the Roma..."
"A beautifully presented semi detached family home, extended and renovated to a high standard. The property comprises of 3 double bedrooms, playroom/additional bedroom, large living/dining/kitchen, family bathroom and additional separate wc, large lawned garden and free on street parking."
This classic double bay fronted semi detached house originally dates from the 1930's and enjoys a much sought after position on Englishcombe Lane with widespread views across the City of Bath and surrounding countryside. the house offers scope for an ingoing purchaser to update and modernise the ...
"A handsome Bath stone 1930s property located in the popular Newbridge area of Bath. Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN and provides scope to MODERNISE and EXTEND. Gardens to the front, side and rear. Two reception rooms. Bathroom and shower room. Close to CHELSEA ROAD shops and cafes."
"Allen and Harris are bringing to market this two bedroom semi-detached property, conveniently positioned on the south western side of Bath with easy access to Bristol and surrounding villages."
"This three storey cottage offers unexpectedly spacious accommodation that includes three double bedrooms and two versatile reception rooms. Within walking distance of the local amenities in Batheaston, the property now requires some improvements so viewing is essential to appreciate the potential."
"Within an impressive Georgian townhouse in one of Bath's prime residential locations, this ground floor apartment has been tastefully finished and enhanced to offer a spacious layout with quality fittings. Offering stylish decor, this is the perfect home on a level walk of the city."
"Entrance Hall | Private Hallway | Kitchen | Spacious living/dining room | 2 double bedrooms | Bathroom | Private off street parking | Communal garden to rear. London Paddington 90 mins from Bath Spa Station, M4 junction 18 approx 10 miles."
The two apartments are both entered via their own entrance doors with storage cupboards. The living spaces are light and bright with seamless flow into the kitchen areas which benefits from integrated appliances. The open plan living spaces create areas to relax with room for sofa and table or us...
"An impressive, intriguing and well-proportioned lower ground floor apartment with a private entrance, set at the heart of one of the renowned Bath Crescents, providing remarkable outside space and excellent scope for transformation."
"A spacious two double bedroomed detached bungalow, with level access driveway. The property is being sold with no onward chain."
"This charming late-Victorian property has two double bedrooms, great city views and a wonderful, cul-de-sac position between Bear Flat and Widcombe, just a downhill stroll to town and Bath Spa railway station."
" Nestled away in a peaceful position in the heart of Weston village, can be found this characterful three bedroom cottage, offered to the market with no onward chain. The charming Grade II Listed home boasts enviable kerb appeal, impressing with an attractive stone façade, whilst internally ben..."
"A well presented, two bedroom mews house."
A beautifully presented 2 bedroom Georgian courtyard apartment that has been a very successful holiday let.
"A stylish, modern, ground floor 2 bedroom, 2 bathroom maisonette apartment with private off-street parking and communal gardens close to the station"
A beautifully presented two bedroom ground floor flat situated in this popular riverside location
"Please quote Reference RM0334.  Beautifully presented extended semi detached family home in a cul de sac location.  Accommodation includes sitting room with a lovely wood burner, dining room, kitchen/ breakfast room, upstairs there are three bedrooms, study and a family bathroom.&nbs..."
"A delightful, beautifully presented two bedroom apartment within this superbly located Grade I Listed terrace in the centre of Bath. To be sold with no onward chain."
"BRAND NEW three-bedroom home, set over TWO FLOORS. Open-plan living room/dining space/kitchen with breakfast bar, and a useful downstairs cloakroom. On the first floor is a generous master bedroom with ensuite, two further bedrooms and a bathroom. There are two parking spaces."
An immaculately presented three bedroom semi-detached family home with further potential to extend. Set in an elevated position with far reaching countryside views. Large detached garage with driveway parking and sold with no onward chain.
"A stunning family mews cottage situated in one of Bath's coveted village locations of Batheaston, on the outskirts of the city. A beautifully presented Grade II listed end of terrace. The property is overflowing with original period features, recently refurbished, warm, stylish and welcomin..."
"A semi detached family home set within a cul-de-sac with gardens to the front, side and rear."
"Exclusively designed for the over 70's, these stunning apartments are ideal for people looking to maintain their independence in a home they own. There is care provided by a qualified team, staff on-site 24 hours a day, and a host of facilities including a laundry, lounge and function room. A..."
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to purchase this upgraded and well maintained 4 bedroomed, fully licenced student HMO situated in a prime residential location. The property is let at a figure of £29,760 PA (giving a gross return of 6.2%) for the academic year 22/23. "
"Home Estate Agents of Bath are favoured with the instructions to market this impressively spacious five bedroomed HMO set in the heart of Oldfield Park. The property generates an annual income of £29,100 giving a gross return of 6.07%. "
"A contemporary three bedroom house. Octohaus - an exclusive collection of eight, three and four bedroom design led houses with parking in Bath."
A fine and deceptively spacious period house in a sought after and convenient road close to shops and amenities in Chelsea Road and just over a mile from the centre of Bath
BRAND NEW HOUSE l 4 BEDROOMS l GARDEN l HAND-CRAFTED BESPOKE KITCHEN l HIGH SPEC DESIGNER BATHROOMS l ELECTRIC CAR CHARGING POINT l ALLOCATED PARKING l BUILDZONE WARRANTY l Herringbone LVT FLOORING
An attractive 1930`s semi detached property on a peaceful and elevated plot offering light and bright accommodation over two floors within a mile from Larkhall. Established and well tended 93ft south facing garden with scenic views towards Bathampton. Garage and off road parking to the rear.
"A spacious three double bedroom detached bungalow in need of refurbishment, situated in a fabulous location enjoying distant views from an elevated position on the western fringe of Bathford village"
"A four bedroom semi-detached home. Immaculately presented throughout with open-plan living on the ground floor and loft conversion. Ideal location for access to the city, local amenities and all levels of schooling."
" Offered to the market with no onward chain, can be found this characterful three bedroom end of terrace home, offering ample potential to a new owner. Constructed as one of three cottages in the 1920s, this charming home was occupied by the local paper mill workers, however in more recent times..."
"A rare opportunity to acquire an existing HMO duplex apartment, found in the ever popular Bathwick Street. The shared front door with intercom system, takes you through to the shared entrance hallway that gives access to the rear gardens and the stair case. The property is..."
"Two bedroom, top floor apartment in city centre garden square. A perfect Air BnB. This fourth floor apartment shares a classic Georgian townhouse with three others and is in a prime city centre location. There's shared access into a bright and light hallway maintained by a management company. In..."
"A three bedroom Edwardian terraced home with southerly aspect garden. Nicely presented throughout with loft conversion and further potential to extend if required. A great location for local amenities, all levels of schooling and easy access to the city with no onward chain."
"A second floor, one bedroom apartment in Bath’s prestigious Great Pulteney Street. Number 36 Great Pulteney Street is at the Holburne Museum end of this elegant terrace of fine Grade I listed Georgian townhouses. Flat four benefits from large, panelled windows providing great views yet maintaini..."
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to purchase this substantial stone built 3 double bedroom Edwardian bay fronted property believed to date from 1902. The benefits include gas heating, double glazing and an abundance of historic character. "
This stylish cottage is situated within a generous plot adjacent to the Bradford on Avon railway line along with a well-proportioned outbuilding. The house offers three bedrooms along with an open plan kitchen/dining area and a sitting room.
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase a three bedroom bungalow situated just over two miles away from the lovely Alexandra Park. This bungalow has a lovely divide, on the east side of the bungalow you have your bedrooms and on the west side you have your living accommodation. Allowing for the smooth ..."
"Set in a quiet corner at the end of a no-through road, this semi detached home provides THREE DOUBEL BEDROOMS and appealing open plan ground floor, together with private parking and garage, all set against a backdrop of light woodland."
"Set within one of the most historic and attractive crescents in Bath, a ground floor apartment, with the benefit of two bedrooms, terraced garden and the potential to acquire a double-parking space to the rear."
A superb one bedroom apartment within this prestigious Grade I Listed terrace in the centre of Bath.
"This fine apartment is situated in the Widcombe area of the city and forms part of a grand, detached, Georgian residence. The ground floor home boasts an excellent level rear garden with stunning city views. Presented in excellent condition throughout, comprising your own entrance hall and grand..."
"In Need Of Upgrading This Spacious 1960's Built, Three Bedroom Family Home Is Located On The Southern Slopes With Splendid Views, Two Off Street Parking Spaces & Large Gardens To The Rear. Early Viewing Essential."
"An elegant, spacious and light first floor apartment situated in this most sought after location, benefiting from open plan living space and a private sunny roof terrace to the rear, solely accessed from the communal half landing."
"A fabulous three bedroom first floor apartment in this imposing detached Victorian residence, located on the west side of the city. Peacefully located at the end of a cul-de-sac, the high ceilings and large windows create a wonderfully light home, and the flat also benefits from a large storeroom..."
"A very pretty double-fronted semi-detached Georgian cottage in this most delightful, highly convenient and central location, with gardens running down to and overlooking the River Avon. Although now in need of modernisation, the house offers particularly charming accommodation and is Listed Grade..."
A five bedroom HMO currently taking in £2750 after management charges and a new yield of 6.6% return.
"A unique 2 bedroom ground floor ‘wharf side’ retirement property, one of 54 in a sought after development located in a highly desirable residential location, close to excellent local amenities and Bath city centre."
"A unique and beautifully presented detached period home, developed from a former commercial premises and currently operated as a successful holiday let. The award winning refurbishment has created a stylish mews style property with fantastic attention to the building’s history, whilst addin..."
"With delightful views over open fields and the Cotswold Way, this 3 bedroom semi detached family home in the Weston area of Bath is ideal for a young family, being so close to Weston All Saints Primary School, also the M4. With scope to extend to the side or rear (subject to planning permission)."
A unique opportunity to develop this Grade II listed chapel with planning approval for a four-bedroom conversion. Planning reference for approval is 17/02884/LBA The Old Baptist Chapel Bathford 
A charming three bedroom property situated on the lower slopes of Oldfield Park in Bath. A lovely light and spacious mid terraced property with elevated south facing garden and far reaching views across the city. No onward chain.
"A beautifully presented 2 bedroom Victorian mansion apartment in the desirable village of Bathampton, to the east of Bath. The accommodation includes sitting room, 2 good sized double bedrooms, modern kitchen and bathroom, with high ceilings, lots of natural light and its own private entrance. ..."
"Please quote reference RM0334. A fantastic HMO currently yielding £37,884 per annum.  This semi detached property is in fantastic condition.  Accommodation includes six bedrooms, kitchen, sitting room, two bathrooms and a lovely garden.
"
"A well performing HMO in a popular student location consisting of 5 bedrooms over 4 floors producing an annual income of £31,337 over an 11.5 month term which creates a yield of 6.26%."
An exquisitely detailed 1006sqft three storey no chain late Victorian terrace with 150ft+ rear gardens. EPC rating - D. Council tax band- C.
A detached three bedroom single storey house located in an elevated position on the southern slopes of Bath with stunning views over the city and beyond. The vendor says: “We have been here 25 years and the beautiful views over Bath from Bannerdown up to the Lansdown Racecourse are st...
"A spacious and stylish Penthouse with wrap-around balcony, two double bedrooms and stunning views"
"A beautifully presented fifth floor, two bedroom apartment situated within one of Bath's most famous buildings; The Empire. Offering two bathrooms and stunning views over the city, this is a wonderful city centre home."
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to purchase this utterly superb substantial stone built four bedroom HMO property situated in a highly sought after location and let out next academic year for £26,400. The benefits include gas heating, double glazing and a very well proportioned garden. "
"An extended Oldfield Park three storey period property with bayed sitting room, impressive open plan kitchen dining room and level rear garden with garage off road parking to the rear. No onward chain."
Enjoy all the benefits of living in central Bath in this spacious two bedroom apartment with its own balcony and garage. 
Absolutely superb two bedroom apartment in this iconic central Bath location.
"***CHARACTER COTTAGE WITH A HIGH END FINISH, GARDENS AND AMPLE PRIVATE PARKING*** The property comprises an attractive semi detached cottage built in stone with a tiled roof, the earliest part is believed to date from the 1890's. It has been sympathetically extended and provides characte..."
This is a beautifully presented TWO BEDROOM Retirement apartment occupying a prime position at upper ground floor level so very convenient to the excellent communal facilities including lounge and bistro.
"Carly@NEXA is delighted to bring to market this beautifully fully refurbished three-bedroom family home located in Oldfield Park. En-suite shower room to master, open plan living with newly fitted kitchen, utility room, sunroom & large family gardens.Viewings available this weekend Saturday& Sunday."
"An absolutely pristine 930sqft semi detached three bedroom bungalow, enjoying views over to Lansdown from the beautifully bright extended kitchen/diner. Sole Agents. EPC rating= D. Council tax band- D."
"On the west side of Bath, a stone built terraced house which has been extended and given a contemporary style internally refurbished to a high standard and specification. Many attractive and commendable features."
"This elegant two-bedroom second floor property is located in a stunning Georgian building in the desirable area of Portland Place. The property boasts a stunning south facing siting room, two generously sized double bedrooms, bright kitchen and a newly renovated bathroom. The stylish interior exu..."
A 4 bedroom HMO in Oldfield Park generating a 5.48% yield until July 2023 then increasing to 6.21%. Tenancies agreed until 30/06/24.
"This well-maintained first floor studio flat sits in an elegant Victorian house, offering typically high ceilings, a separate shower room with kitchen to corner and the large windows also supply a good amount of light to the main room. Located on Newbridge Road you have an abundance of amenities"
"Good Sized Mid Terrace Property With Garden and Some Lovely Views to The Rear. Set in a Sought After Location, The Property Is Well Presented and Offers Opportunity To Stamp Your Own Mark On This Great Family Home. "
"A beautifully presented two DOUBLE bedroom first floor apartment situated in an extremely desirable location next to Royal Victoria Park. The property boasts well balanced light and airy accommodation along with private parking, garaging and ENCLOSED COURTYARD."
An elegant double fronted 2 bedroom first floor apartment located in a sought after position on Bath’s highly prized northern slopes.
"A spacious two-bedroom apartment in Bath’s most iconic Grade II listed landmark building,enjoying wonderful views over the River Avon and City of Bath."
A three bedroom end-terrace cottage set in a peaceful elevated countryside location. Beautiful valley views and with a good size south facing garden and driveway parking. Could benefit from some cosmetic upgrading throughout and is sold with no onward chain. 
" A beautifully presented ground floor apartment forming part of this impressive Grade I Listed Georgian townhouse positioned in this prime and highly sought-after location, just a few minutes level walk from Pulteney Bridge and the centre of Bath. This bright and spacious property enjoys an abun..."
"This two bedroom Georgian Grade II Listed maisonette apartment offers generously sized living accommodation over two levels, positioned in a block of two properties within a Georgian converted building, as well as an allocated car parking space to the front located just off Walcot Street."
An immaculately presented two double bedroom modern terrace home with driveway parking. Built in 2018 this house sits on the very popular Mulberry Park development in Combe Down. Thoughtfully designed for modern living with a hi-spec finish and highly energy efficient.
"Please quote reference RM0334. A fantastic family home with lovely views.  Accommodation includes a well fitted kitchen, dining room and sitting room.  On the first floor there are three bedrooms and a family shower room.  Outside there is a fantastic garden, with a st..."
ENGLISH COMBE VILLAGE ! *** SEMI RURAL LOCATION *** GARDEN IN EXCESS 50FT *** 19FT OPEN PLAN KITCHEN *** SEPARATE UTILITY ***GROUND FLOOR SHOWER ROOM *** BACKING ONTO COUNTRYSIDE *** BOOK A VIEWING ONLINE
"A charming and beautifully presented 2 bedroom Georgian cottage in a peaceful and particularly sought after “no through” road, with a private South West facing garden, and parking."
A mid terraced family home offering a wonderful garden and spectacular views from the rear.
A mid-terraced two double bedroom home located in the popular Oldfield Park area of Bath with excellent access to local schools and transport in and out of the city. No onward chain.
"A pretty 2/3 bedroom top floor apartment in a fine central location, enjoying beautiful elevated views."
"A spacious, two-bedroom, first floor flat within walking distance of the City Centre with the added benefit of a balcony and private garage"
A classic Georgian ground floor apartment with a private west facing balcony in a central location close to Queen Square and Royal Avenue.
"A charming Listed late 18th Century terraced cottage most pleasantly situated in the heart of the thriving village of Bathford, enjoying a pleasing open outlook to both front and rear. EXTERNALLY Attractive garden to the front, facing approximately South. The pretty garden is enclosed by natu..."
A two double bedroom modern mid-terrace home with designated parking. Built in 2019 this house sits on the very popular Mulberry Park development in Combe Down. Thoughtfully designed for modern living with a hi-spec finish and highly energy efficient.
"We are delighted to bring to market this modern first floor apartment situated in the gated community of Heather Rise. Boasting two allocated parking spaces, communal garden/ BBQ area and its own front door, this property has a lot to offer."
"We are delighted to bring to market this spacious two bedroom apartment in Grosvenor Place. This grand first floor apartment boasts some beautiful original features and large sash windows which allows natural light to flood in. This property comprises: sitting room, kitchen, two bedrooms, one wit..."
"Set in one the most favoured roads on the north-eastern slopes of the city of Bath and enjoying outstanding views from high ground, this Victorian style house provides well-proportioned living space over two floors, including three double bedrooms."
*Semi Detached Bungalow* *Two Double Bedrooms* **Open Plan Living/Dining Area* *Sitting Room/Bedroom 3* *Large Level Garden* *Driveway Parking* 
"A beautifully presented two bedroom apartment forming part of a magnificent Grade I Listed Building, in a fantastic city centre location, just minutes from all of the hustle and bustle of Bath and Bath Spa train station. No onward chain."
"A four double bedroom 956sqft significantly extended licensed HMO, let until summer 2024 with a 6.68% yield. Valley views and a two car driveway. EPC rating; C Council tax band; B"
A nicely presented two bedroom double fronted terrace cottage. Immaculately presented and retaining period features throughout. Good size garden and close to all local amenities with easy access to the city.
A two double bedroom top floor Georgian apartment with the most amazing City views in Camden Crescent.
"A fantastic opportunity to buy a newly refurbished 4 bedroom 3 bathroom property with HMO Planning/License near completion for 4 persons. Tenants secured for summer 23 with Gross Rent £30,000 per annum. 7.2% Gross Yield."
"Home Estate Agents of Bath are pleased to offer this spacious and well maintained 3 bedroomed stone built family home situated on a corner plot within The Oval. The property briefly comprises from gas central heating, modern fitted kitchen, landscaped gardens and off road parking for 3 cars. "
"Calling Investors. 3 Double Bedroom Terraced HMO House with a small room upstairs currently used for storage. Very Well Presented Furnished Freehold 3 bedroom HMO, Georgian House in Bath, less than 1 mile from City Centre. Grade II Listed. New Secondary Glazing/Double Glazing recently instal..."
"Peaceful two bedroom apartment in Bath's iconic Grade II listed Empire building ideally located right in the heart of this World heritage city, with fine south-westerly views over the rear of Bath Guildhall and Bath Abbey. The Empire was originally built as a luxury hotel in 1901 for ..."
@Home Estate Agents of Bath are favoured with the instructions to market this spacious 3 bedroom period property terraced home situated in a cul de sac location within Lower Weston. Please call to arrange a viewing. 
"As you enter the property you are greeted by a clever storage area, somewhere to hang your coats and bags, as you continue into the property you are presented by the lounge. Withing this room you will notice the amount of natural light which illuminates the room. Off of the lounge, you are greete..."
Stunning views for miles over Englishcombe to Timsbury and beyond plus a suntrap southwest facing rear garden.
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to purchase this substantial stone built two bedroom Victorian property situated in a highly sought after location. The benefits include gas heating, double glazing and a potential garden office. "
Geogian apartment l first floor l views over Bath l central location l 2 bedrooms l period features
We are proud to bring to market this impressive first floor apartment situated in the heart of Bath. Not only has this spacious property been recently been renovated to a high standard but it is also being offered to the market fully furnished boasting brand new high spec furniture throughout. Th...
"An interesting two double bedroom property, with planning permission to extend single storey rear extension, plus opportunity to double the size of property by adding a two storey side extension and loft conversion. The property has recently been refurbished and extended, offering quality, spacio..."
" A spacious 3 double bedroom apartment on the first floor of a particularly fine detached period house, peacefully tucked away in a sought after and convenient location with parking and shared gardens. EXTERNALLY The property stands in attractive communal gardens, mostly laid to lawn. There..."
"Enjoying extensive views across Bath, a second floor one bedroom apartment set in this sought after building with the added benefit of a garage."
This stunning 2 bedroom top floor apartment is located in the desirable Camden Crescent area of Bath.
"This fabulous and unique apartment is situated in Bath City and forms part of a grade II listed townhouse constructed in the 1760's. Boasting its own private entrance and courtyard gardens. Accommodation is a spacious 1009 square feet and includes entrance hall, living room with lovely period fir..."
"A beautifully presented one-bedroom top floor apartment with delightful views, in a prime residential, city centre street. Recently run as a successful AirBnB, it is also ideal for long-term letting or a lovely foothold within Georgian Bath."
@ Home Estate Agents of Bath are pleased to bring to the market this extended 3-bedroom end of terrace family home set withinthis popular residential development. The spacious and well-appointed family accommodation offers a large kitchen/diner with the addition of further seating area and more. 
"A unique courtyard garden maisonette, within the handsome grade II listed building that is The Old Walcot School. Large open plan living/kitchen/diner, double bedroom with ensuite and further double bedroom, downstairs bathroom and private courtyard, within walking distance to the city centre. Le..."
An extended two bedroom period terraced property located less than 100 metres from Moorland Road being sold with no onward chain.
"Two bedroom, end of terrace bungalow with garage parking"
A most attractive 2 bedroom townhouse on the outskirts of Bath within beautifully maintained grounds and with the benefit of a private parking space and private terrace.
Set within this fine Grade 2 listed period house is this two bedroom apartment with a roof terrace affording fantastic views of leafy Lyncombe Vale. The vendor has already found a property which is the top of chain.
A one bedroom second floor apartment with views looking over Kensington Meadow's with great access in and out of the city.
We are delighted to bring to market this sleek and modern first floor apartment in the popular Riverside development. The Palladian is situated just a short level walk away from the city centre and is close multiple transport links and local shops. The property also boasts good views over Bath an...
"Allen and Harris are bringing to the market this smart and well-equipped end of terrace, three bedroom family home that is conveniently located closely to some of Bath's tranquil countryside walks on Old Fosse Road."
"A central, two bedroom apartment on the first floor within the highly sought after and unique Caxton Court within a stones throw of both the historic centre of Bath and Pulteney Bridge. No onward chain. (Approximately 646 sq ft / 60 sq m)"
"A central Grade II listed two-bedroom apartment, boasting a walled private rear garden"
"We are proud to bring to market this stunning one bedroom ground floor property situated in the popular Portland Place. This bright and airy property boasts harmonious proportions, beautiful period features and lovely views, and is just a short walk away from the city centre. This apartment would..."
"BRAND NEW coach house apartment with two-bedrooms. Spacious kitchen/living/dining area for open-plan living. Two double bedrooms - one with en-suite, and a separate bathroom. One allocated parking space."
"South West facing, One bedroom, ground floor retirement apartment with balcony overlooking the stream. Prime location."
" A well presented, particularly spacious apartment with 2 double bedrooms and a very large living room, contained within a grand and imposing Victorian house and most conveniently located just a short walk from the centre of Bath. ACCOMMODATION kitchen 19’ x 15’1 living room ..."
"High ceilings first floor apartment on a lovely pedestrianised street in the heart of the city centre only 0.3 miles from train station. Two double bedrooms, sitting room, separate kitchen, a large hallway and a bathroom. No onward chain."
Light and spacious one bedroom apartment on the banks of the river.
"A two bedroom apartment, situated on the upper floor of a grade II listed Georgian townhouse. The home has views across Bath Rugby's playing fields and to the hills beyond. Internally the home comprises a spacious entrance hall with fitted cupboards, lounge, kitchen breakfast room, two bedrooms w..."
2 Double Bedrooms | Balcony | Vaults | Private Entrance | Parking. 713 sqft. Great Investment Opportunity 
A courtyard apartment situated within a Grade I listed Georgian building in the heart of Bath.
"A Contemporary Chain Free, Two Bedroom Ground Floor Apartment Part Of This Georgian Building, Converted In 2005/6 Retaining Much Of The Original Early 1800s Character, With An Unusual Hexagonal Style To Its Design Creating Unique Living Space. "
"A two bedroom maisonette in a fantastic location 0.2 miles away from Bath Spa train station with a garden, garage and one further parking space."
"A stunning ground floor garden apartment, beautifully maintained and refurbished to a high standard, backing Kensington Meadows and situated within easy reach of both the City centre and Larkhall Village."
"Ideal investment property, sold with good tenants in situ until at least October 2023. A recently modernised three-bedroom mid-terrace home situated in a good area close to amenities and transport links. The property is spacious and offers a hallway, a sitting room overlooking the..."
"A recently refurbished, nicely presented 3-bedroom family home with off-street parking and private garden in a popular location."
A beautifully presented 1st-floor apartment with spacious accommodation situated in the popular village of Larkhall.
"This modernised home offers two double bedrooms, off-street parking, and an outbuilding being used as a study."
A fantastic three bedroom mid terraced house with garage and parking.
"This spacious two bedroom apartment is located in one of Bath's finest converted riverside mills. The development complete with central courtyard space grants convenient access to everything Bath has to offer. Light, bright and airy with a peaceful and serene ambience."
"Two one bedroom flats as per regulations but is yet to be split on the title, offering versatile accommodation in Combe Down village."
"A spacious, first-floor, one-bedroom apartment within this purpose-built retirement development with a double-width terrace overlooking the Lam Brook."
A beautifully bright and spacious one bedroom retirement apartment on the second floor with a Juliet balcony. ONE HOUR OF DOMESTIC ASSISTANCE INCLUDED PER WEEK. Onsite Bistro restaurant serving delicious meals.
A SUPER ONE BEDROOM SOUTH WEST FACING SECOND FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT with Balcony overlooking the garden.
"Set within in a Grade II* Listed Georgian townhouse, this one bedroom garden apartment with a green area in front of the crescent that was originally a formal garden for the residents, and the riverside towpath within walking distance as well as Bath City Centre."
"We are proud to present this stylish top floor apartment in the highly sought after Brock Street. This elegant property can be found less than a minutes’ walk away from, and is the linking street between, the landmark addresses of The Circus and the Royal Crescent. The apartment comprises of mode..."
A well-presented and characterful upper maisonette located on Newbridge Road with great access to many local amenities. Generous south facing sitting room. Gas central heating and double glazed windows to the front. Close to RUH and Royal Victoria Park. Regular bus service to the city centre
"This apartment is on the top floor of an impressive Georgian building, Hayes Mount was designed by architect Thomas Jelly who developed a series of villas on the street, making use of the spectacular views was a key aim. Entering the handsome building via the communal gardens you will find the la..."
"A distinctive, beautifully designed city centre lift serviced one bedroom apartment, with elegant period detail. As well as a fantastic open living space, a 14' ceiling height, and stunning bay window creating lots of natural light."
"An attractive and charming period house in a convenient and sought after residential area yards from local shops, Royal United Hospital and just two or so miles from the city centre."
A four bedroom property terraced property with the added benefit of a conservatory and off street parking.
"This beautifully presented three bedroom end of terrace house is situated in Odd Down, a popular location with some wonderful far reaching views. The property benefits from gas central hea..."
"Charming one-bedroom, Georgian mews house in the centre of Bath"
Beautifully presented no chain three bedroom 832sqft Edwardian terrace with plenty of retained character and a landscaped rear garden. EPC rating D Council tax band B
"An attractive two bedroom period terraced cottage in a quiet spot at the heart of Larkhall village, with private gardens to front and rear, forming part of a charming terrace within easy reach of the local shops and cafes."
Recently refurbished throughout two bedroom first floor apartment with lift access and delightful outlook.
"An impressive and elegant one bedroom apartment forming part of a Grade II listing building. Open plan living/dining/kitchen, large double bedroom with a range of built in storage, modern shower room. No onward chain."
"Charming city centre, one bedroom top floor apartment enjoying views over the city"
"A spacious one-bedroom apartment in Bath’s most iconic Grade II listed landmark building, enjoying wonderful views over the River Avon and City of Bath from its private balcony"
"A 1950s extended mid-terrace property, offering two double bedrooms and off-street parking."
"We are delighted to present this spacious one-bedroom apartment in the sought-after Widcombe Crescent. Boasting stunning views over Bath, this first floor apartment comprises: large open plan sitting room/ kitchen, double bedroom and bathroom."
"A bright and elevated apartment set just a few minutes from Widcombe shopping parade and Bath Spa train station. Offering 2 bedrooms, fine views, allocated parking, garage and no onward chain."
A very well presented second floor 1 bedroom apartment located in the heart of the city with attractive roof top view over centre of Bath.
A beautifully bright and spacious one bedroom retirement apartment on the First floor with a double aspect lounge and Balcony ONE HOUR OF DOMESTIC ASSISTANCE INCLUDED PER WEEK. Onsite Bistro restaurant serving delicious meals.
"Allen and Harris are bringing to market this three bedroom semi-detached home decorated to a high contemporary standard throughout also with both garden spaces low maintenance, located on the southern side of Bath, within a short drive into the town centre."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN. A delightful and airy Grade II listed, one bedroom lower maisonette, located in the heart of Bath within walking distance of all the excellent amenities the city has to offer. Period character and remains of 999 year lease. Kitchen/diner and sitting room. "
"Enjoying superb countryside views and sunny west facing gardens, a solid and sensible end terraced corner plot 850sqft family home. EPC rating - D. Council tax band - B."
"A fantastic two double bedroom apartment offered to the market with no onward chain. The property is light and airy, with well balanced accommodation, balcony, single garage and communal gardens."
"*An immaculate first floor apartment located in Brunswick Street, close to Bath City Centre* *Light and Airy Open Plan Living Area* *High Spec Modern Kitchen and Bathroom* *Two Double Bedrooms* *Share of Freehold*"
"This fantastic 2-bedroom, self-contained apartment is situated on Brunswick Street and only a short level walk into the city centre. Spanning the first floor of a Victorian terrace, this versatile, freehold apartment has been recently renovated and blends modern and period features seamlessly. "
"A distinctive ground floor garden apartment, which is beautifully presented throughout and is perfectly situated close to the heart of the City centre. NO ONWARD CHAIN."
A semi detached family house with an attractive south facing garden in a quiet and popular residential area on the sought after western fringes of the city.
Elegantly proportioned one double bedroom apartment in a Georgian townhouse in this very desirable central location just off St. James's Square.
"A two bedroom, first floor apartment in an impressive detached period building with communal garden and allocated parking space. Located on this sought after road just up the hill from the city centre, the flat also comes with both a basement bike store and lock up storage space, and is offered w..."
"This charming top floor apartment has been stylishly decorated throughout, benefitting with plenty of character features and stunning south facing views over Kensington Meadows. The light and spacious living room sits peacefully at the rear of the property and retains a handful of period fea..."
"Situated in the heart of the city centre is this top floor apartment. A modern and bright apartment with two good sized bedrooms, this property has a lot to offer. In the sought after location of Philip Street, you cannot get more central than this. The property comprises: open plan sitting room ..."
"An impressive, well presented two bedroom top floor apartment in this renowned late Georgian terrace, situated just to the north east of the City centre."
An attractive two double bedroom character cottage situated right in the heart of Batheaston Village with all amenities on the doorstep and with the rare benefit of a private parking space.
"A two bedroom late Georgian terraced house Listed Grade II, situated in a secluded, well screened position away from traffic yet only 0.5 mile from The Paragon, on the north eastern fringe of the City centre."
A superb 1 bedroom apartment opposite the Theatre Royal in the heart of Bath. First floor with a wealth of features.
"Located on the western edge of Royal Victoria Park, a one bedroom first floor apartment with the benefit of a garage and the use of communal gardens. A short walk from the city centre, the flat is very well presented and has no onward chain. ACCOMMODATION sitting/dining room with views over..."
A fabulous one bedroom first floor Georgian apartment situated on Walcot Parade. The property boasts well balanced light and airy accommodation offered to the market with no onward chain.
Hollis Morgan – MARCH LIVE ONLINE AUCTION - A Leasehold MODERN TERRACED HOUSE ( 841 Sq Ft ) in good order with PARKING and REDUCED PRICE FOR AUCTION and flexible 3 / 4 bed accommodation.
"One of only three stunning, newly renovated, Grade II listed 1 bedroom apartments in the centre of Bath, currently used for holiday letting"
"A 1970s built 3 bedroom semi detached property. An ideal forst time purchade or investment property which inc's Living room, Kitchen/diner, 3 bedrooms & a bathroom. Gardens to front & rear with allocated parking a& double glazing. Easy access to Moorland Road & Twerton High Street shopping precincts"
"Stunning, newly renovated, 1 bedroom apartments in the centre of Bath"
"1 of 3 available Stunning, newly renovated, 1 bedroom apartments in the centre of Bath"
"A detached 773sqft no chain two double bedroom bungalow right in the heart of Oldfield Park with double garage, carport and driveway. EPC rating - D. Council tax band- D."
"A spacious grade two listed, one bedroom apartment in central Bath offering panoramic views, set in a beautiful period building."
The Apartment Company welcome to the market this sleek two bedroom top floor apartment in the sought-after Great Stanhope Street. This property boasts the convenience and style of modern living while being situated in the grand Georgian centre of Bath.
"An ideal 'Pied de terre', this 1 bed 1st floor flat is situated at the heart of the Georgian city centre in one of Bath's premier residential locations. Ideal for downsizer , weekender or FTB. Also a tried and tested investment apartment with proven track record. Vacant possession. No onward chain."
"A two bedroom apartment in the city centre set in a building with lift and communal garden. Currently let until July 2023 for £1,495. A sitting room with separate kitchen. Perfect for the city centre and access to river towpath. Offered with no chain."
A great home on a cul-de-sac in Kelston View. Two fabulous bedrooms with amazing views of countryside. Great reception space and plenty of storage. Well presented garden plus the benefit of two parking spaces to the front.
"No Onward Chain Vendor will pay stamp duty for offers of asking price Very Well Presented, Two Bedroom, Level Access Apartment: Ideal for Downsizer, First time buyer or Investor. Through Communal Front Door to Communal Hallway, With Stairs to First Floor. The Apartment Is Found T..."
"Please quote reference RM0334.  A fantastic light and bright two bedroom garden flat.  Accommodation includes kitchen/ Sitting room, Bathroom, two double bedrooms and a lovely garden.  The property is offered with no onward chain. The property occupies a most convenient ..."
A private entrance apartment with two double bedrooms and its very own rear garden. The properties are being renovated to a high standard and also offers an allocated off street parking space.
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to purchase this spacious 3 bedroomed end of terraced family home situated in the most popular Sulis Meadows development on the south side of Bath, with off road parking, through lounge/diner and gardens to front & rear. An early inspection is highly recommended. "
Hollis Morgan – A Freehold SEMI DETACHED HOUSE ( 772 Sq Ft ) in need of BASIC UPDATING occupying a larger than average elevated CORNER PLOT with development potential subject to planning consents
Superb southerly views over Norfolk Crescent green from the front of this beautifully spacious 625sqft top floor city apartment. Sole Agents. EPC rating- E. Council tax band- B.
"A three bedroom mid terraced family home with off street parking and views to the back, a perfect starter home or investment."
"A three bedroom end of terraced house in need of modernisation and offering excellent extension potential, situated on the edge of LARKHALL VILLAGE and in a lovely spot overlooking playing fields."
"An excellent opportunity to acquire this spacious, 3 bedroom end of terrace family home, situated on this popular residential estate, benefitting fro gas heating, double glazing and no onward chain. Phone to arrange an internal inspection."
"An impressive one bedroom apartment forming part of Beau House within the sought after area of 'Bath Riverside'. Reception room with a Juliet balcony a modern open plan fully fitted kitchen, double bedroom, modern bathroom with shower over bath. Parking permit for rear car park."
"With its own front door and two upper floors of accommodation, this two bedroom maisonette feels like a house within a house."
A three bedroom first floor flat offering versatile accommodation with parking and garage in Larkhall.
A well-presented one bedroom apartment in this impressive building on Great Pulteney Street. Level walk into the centre of Bath. Residents restricted to over 55 years old
BEAUTIFULLY PROPORTIONED FIRST FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT with exceptional views over the lovely Limpley Stoke valley. NO CHAIN.
"This contemporary open plan apartment sits on the highly sought after riverside complex which offers a modern community lifestyle setting, with coffee shops and attractive communal areas ,riverside walks and the heart of the city along with mainline rail links is right on the doorstep."
"Please quote reference RM0334.  A two bedroom mid terraced house found on a no through road in the popular location of Sulis Meadows to the south of Bath. The property benefits from light, well balanced accommodation set over two floors with two allocated parking spaces and a le..."
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to purchase this stunning south facing ground floor garden apartment situated in a highly sought after location. The benefits include background heating, double glazing and a modern characterful interior. Please call to arrange an internal viewing. "
An elegant first floor apartment situated in Devonshire Buildings with panoramic views.
"The Apartment Company are delighted to bring to market this superb top floor apartment situated on the Northern slopes of Bath, a short walk into the city with all the main bus routes on your doorstep."
"The apartment has been tastefully completed to provide comfortable and stylish accommodation. Positioned on the ground floor, this apartment is entered via its own entrance door into an entrance lobby with storage cupboard and a place to store coats and shoes. The living space is light and bright..."
"The apartment has been tastefully completed to provide comfortable and stylish accommodation. Positioned on the first floor, this apartment is entered via its own entrance door with staircase leading to the landing with storage cupboard. The living space is light and bright with seamless flow int..."
A really smart one bedroom flat within a short walk of the City and enjoying an open outlook across Cleveland Bridge towards Bathwick and beyond.
"A two bed, semi-detached property with off road parking and a south-westerly facing garden, perfect for a first time buyer or investor."
A smart well presented light and airy second floor apartment with the benefit of a delightful walled south west communal garden and enjoying pleasant open views to the front and rear in a prime central position just a few minutes walk from the centre of Bath.
"On entering the property, the hallway gives you access to all rooms and provides a handy storage cupboard, housing the combi boiler. The living area is generous in size allowing room for both seating and dining furniture. Twin sash windows bring ample natural light and incredible views over the c..."
100% ownership. No onward chain. A one bedroom apartment In Minerva Court with lift access on the second floor 0.4 miles from Bath City Centre.
End of terrace family home needing modernisation with no onward chain in the popular Larkhill area and we are now booking in viewings. Please note that this property is being sold through the Modern Method of Auction please see Auction notes below.
"A well presented, second floor apartment situated in Bath city centre and within a grade II listed Georgian townhouse. The home has the extra benefit of a private parking space with a secure gated parking area to the rear. Internally the home offers an entrance hall, a fabulous and spacious open ..."
"A one bedroom retirement apartment for the over 55's. Situated in Minerva Court, popular due to its city centre location and proximity to Henrietta Park. The home is on the first floor and can be access via a lift. Internally the apartment has a spacious feel with wide entrance hall with storage ..."
A no chain 928sqft semi detached BISF three bedroom home in excellent order with a generous west facing 46ft x 28ft rear garden. EPC rating - C Council tax band - A
Great view from this three bedroom first floor apartment with an enclosed balcony and garage. Modernising required.
Vulcan House is conveniently located within easy reach of Pulteney Bridge. The two bedroom maisonette offers tremendous accommodation and the opportunity to renovate to taste. The address includes extensive gardens to the rear and the light and airy home further offers a lovely outlook.
Two double bedroom apartment with allocated off road parking
Squeaky clean and presented in tip top order a two bedroom detached park home for the over 55's. Built in 2019 and used a show home until 2021 when the present owners moved in and believed to be one of the largest on the site. Bathroom and ensuite + dressing room of the main bedroom.
"Set within the central area of the bustling historic city of Bath this top floor apartment enjoys spacious bright living combined with attractive open views to both the front and rear, air BnB potential."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain, can be found this excellently presented one bedroom Over 55's apartment. The apartment is situated within the popular 'Minerva Court' development, found on St Johns Road, only a short walk away from the city centre and the idyllic Henrietta ..."
"An appealing, well maintained and improved split level two/three bedroom maisonette with a private garden, situated in a traffic-free close around half a mile from Larkhall Village High Street (LET TO AUG '23 - £1200 pcm)."
"A two bedroom, ground floor, retirement apartment in central Bath"
"This fabulous one-bedroomed apartment, with private garden, situated just a short distance to the Bath Spa bus/railway stations and within walking distance to all city amenities."
"A grade II listed, first floor apartment with open plan living accommodation in Bath city centre."
"A simply stunning one bedroom first floor flat close to the heart of the City at Bathwick, providing light, beautifully presented living space, combining both traditional and contemporary elements in its design."
"A Grade II listed; second floor, one bedroom apartment situated in a central location."
" Offered to the market with no onward chain, can be found this upper floor, two bedroom apartment, situated in a popular residential area within Odd Down. The property benefits from sizeable room proportions and comprises an entrance hall, a bright & spacious lounge/diner, fitted kitchen, famil..."
" A light and airy top floor apartment in this highly convenient and popular location adjacent to the city centre. Contained within an elegant double fronted Listed Georgian townhouse, the property enjoys a lovely widespread and open view in front, across Cleveland Bridge and to the Southern hill..."
Tastefully presented ground floor one bedroom apartment in this prestigious Georgian-style apartment building in central Bath. 
"An excellent opportunity has arisen to purchase this stunning large open plan two bedroom apartment within a fine Georgian building which we believe was built by Henry Edmund Goodridge in 1829. The benefits include an abundance of historic character, gas heating and a highly sought after location."
Superbly presented and upgraded one bedroom apartment on the first floor of this sought-after building in central Bath.
"Situated on Great Stanhope Street in Bath City centre. Forming part of a grade II listed Georgian building and providing level access the main centre. The apartment is on the second floor and comprises entrance hall, living room, separate kitchen, double bedroom, bathroom and separate wc."
"BRAND NEW Park Home (30'x16') Park Home | Fully Furnished | Located on a Wonderful, Established Residential Park In The Stunning Countryside | Traditional Home With Luxury Interior Design | Retirement Property For The Over 50's | Safe and Secure Community | Pet Friendly | Part Exchange Available"
"An elegant larger than usual, second floor studio apartment with semi-rural southerly views. 21 ft studio room, separate fitted kitchen and bathroom offered for sale with no onward chain."
"A light and airy, third floor one bedroom apartment forming part of the desirable Moorings retirement development. The property boasts well balanced accommodation and is conveniently located on the much sought after Bathwick Hill. Offered with No Onward Chain"
"A superb well presented one bedroom ground floor flat with PRIVATE TERRACE GARDEN, situated in an outstanding location close to the heart of Larkhall village and with stunning views across the recreation ground."
A ground floor apartment within this attractive Grade II listed building including a communal garden and parking.
"Well-presented top floor apartment, set on the sought after Newbridge Road"
Luxurious hotel-like living awaits the new owner of this one bedroom apartment in central Bath.
"Beautifully presented one bedroom, ground floor apartment"
This attractive studio apartment within the acclaimed Coachworks development just on the edge of the city centre. Communal garden. Perfect for a first time buyer or an investment buyer. Tenant in situ until 23 July 2023.
First floor one bedroom apartment in need of refurbishment. Located on a popular street just out of the city centre. High ceilings and light and airy space. No chain. Unconditional Auction Tuesday 18th until Wednesday 19th.
"A stylish and contemporary studio in the heart of Bath, forming part of a historic crescent in the city centre."
Hollis Morgan – MAY LIVE ONLINE AUCTION – A Leasehold FIRST FLOOR FLAT ( 370 Sq Ft ) in need of BASIC UPDATING with PERIOD FEATURES in a central location with COMMUNAL GARDEN.
"Refreshingly spacious purpose built ground/garden level, two bedroom retirement apartment in a popular development on Lansdown Lane above Weston Village and on a regular bus link into both Weston and Bath City Centre. For the over 55's this is an ideal opportunity for those wanting a larger t..."
"Situated within a pleasant community in a sought after and peaceful development for the over 55's, is this two double bedroom detached property which offers a modern finish throughout and benefits from no onward chain."
" FOR INVESTMENT, CASH PURCHASERS ONLY. A pretty 3 storey freehold terraced house of character and charm with a protected lifetime tenant. Not Listed, the property is in need of modernisation, enjoys a lovely far reaching view across the Meadows and is most pleasantly situated in the heart of Bat..."
An exciting opportunity to acquire this parcel of land measuring approx. 0.15 acres close to Alice Park in Lower Swainswick and just a short stroll from the amenities of Larkhall on the east side of the city. The plot sits behind both 61 Gloucester Road and The Old Post Office. Whilst we can arra...
"A top floor retirement apartment in a purpose built development. The development benefits from communal facilities provided for the use and enjoyment of all residents, including a resident’s lounge, kitchen-dining room and further sitting rooms on the upper floors plus communal gardens ..."
"A ground floor retirement apartment in a purpose built development The development benefits from communal facilities provided for the use and enjoyment of all residents including a residents lounge, kitchen/dining room and further sitting rooms on the upper floors plus communal gardens a..."
"A first floor retirement apartment in a purpose built development, overlooking the front of the development. The development benefits from communal facilities provided for the use and enjoyment of all residents, including a resident’s lounge, kitchen-dining room and further sitting room..."
"A well appointed, 1 bedroom apartment within this popular retirement development on the edge of Bath. Private Hall, Living Room, Bedroom, Kitchen and Bathroom Suite. There are excellent communal facilities to include; Parking, a Reading Room, Guest Room, Social Lounge / Dining Room and Communal K..."
Hollis Morgan – APRIL LIVE ONLINE AUCTION – A Freehold DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY comprising a RANK OF 3 GARAGES and GARDENS ( 0.05 a ) with access from Bennets Lane.
"A well presented fully self contained studio flat on the doorsteps of the city's shops and facilities. Recently refurbished, perfect investment for a cash buyer. Currently tenanted until July 2023."
"A Ground Floor retirement apartment within a purpose built development. The development has the advantage of communal facilities provided for the use and enjoyment of all residents including a resident’s lounge, kitchen-dining room and further sitting rooms on the upper floors plus communal gar..."
"A two bedroom detached Park home for the over 55's in the popular Quarry Rock Gardens development at Claverton Down, close to National Trust land and the University of Bath."
" Situated within easy reach of the Royal United Hospital, Chelsea Road & Bath city centre, can be found a selection of four private parking spaces available to purchase. Accessed via a secure fob entry system and benefitting from a secure arm barrier, these spaces are an ideal investment opportu..."
"RARE OPPORTUNITY AVAILABLE TO PURCHASE A GARAGE IN THE CITY CENTRE OF BATH! New to the market a single garage in very close proximately to Great Pulteney Street, Henrietta Gardens and the city centre. Perfect for storage or parking your car inside. Single garage ..."
"Single garage with up and over door, within the village of Larkhall, east of the city centre of Bath."
" Situated within easy reach of the Royal United Hospital, Chelsea Road & Bath city centre, can be found a selection of secure, private parking spaces available to purchase. Accessed via a fob entry system and benefitting from a secure arm barrier, these spaces are ideal for those wanting peace o..."
